Utah statutes.
53A-15-1002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Board" means the State Board of Education.

(2)  "Electronic High School" means a rigorous program offering grade 9 - 12 level online courses and coordinated by the board.

(3)  "Home-schooled student" means a student:

(a)  attends a home school;

(b)  is exempt from school attendance pursuant to Section 53A-11-102; and

(c)  attends no more than two regularly scheduled classes or courses in a public school per semester.

(4)  "Open-entry, open-exit" means:

(a)  a method of instructional delivery that allows for flexible scheduling in response to individual student needs or requirements and demonstrated competency when knowledge and skills have been mastered; and

(b)  students have the flexibility to begin or end study at any time, progress through course material at their own pace, and demonstrate competency when knowledge and skills have been mastered.



Amended by Chapter 238, 2012 General Session

